Tennessee, session 114, SB1058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-102, is amended by deleting
subdivision (4) and substituting:
(4)
(A) Recommend tests or vaccinations of animals within this state or
imported into this state for the purpose of protecting the health of animals in this
state; and
(B) Order tests or vaccinations of animals within this state or imported
into this state for the purpose of protecting the health of animals in this state, if
each specific vaccination and test ordered has received prior approval from the
joint government operations committee of the house of representatives and the
senate;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-102, is amended by deleting
subdivision (6).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-2-105, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
The commissioner, through rules, shall establish procedures for the payment of
indemnities for animals destroyed under the authority of this chapter. Indemnity under
this section is based on, but not limited to, the value of the animal and the availability of
funds for that purpose.
SB1058
003257
- 1 -

SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003257